Florida, session 2026, SB784.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.â(1)âWithin 30 days after this act becomes a 17 law, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall seek 18 federal approval through a Medicaid waiver or state plan 19 amendment as needed to provide coverage of continuous glucose 20 monitors and related supplies as a durable medical equipment 21 benefit for Medicaid recipients. A licensed durable medical 22 equipment provider must be reimbursed for continuous glucose 23 monitors and related supplies, provided the claim is submitted 24 through the Medicare Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System. 25 The agency may not require such provider to use a National Drug 26 Code number as part of such claim submission. 27 (2)âThis section does not preclude the agency from 28 providing additional coverage of continuous glucose monitors as 29 a Medicaid pharmacy benefit. 30 (3)âThe agency shall begin implementation of these changes 31 upon receiving any necessary federal approval. 32 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.